Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-707
Property Tax Administrator; administer oaths; compel attendance of witnesses; production of records; rules of procedure for discovery.

(1) The Property Tax Administrator or his or her duly authorized representative may administer oaths, compel the attendance of witnesses, and require the production of records as may be necessary for the performance of his or her responsibilities under applicable state law.

(2) The Property Tax Administrator may adopt and promulgate rules of procedure for discovery, not in conflict with the laws governing discovery in civil cases, as may be necessary for the performance of his or her responsibilities under applicable state law.

Laws 1999, LB 36, § 27.